Hawaii statutes.
[§10H-2] Purpose. The purpose of this
chapter is to provide for and to implement the recognition of the Native
Hawaiian people by means and methods that will facilitate their self‑governance,
including the establishment of, or the amendment to, programs, entities, and
other matters pursuant to law that relate, or affect ownership, possession, or
use of lands by the Native Hawaiian people, and by further promoting their
culture, heritage, entitlements, health, education, and welfare. [L 2011, c
195, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next